Utah statutes.
53B-1-108.   Board succeeds to rights and duties of predecessor board and council.

The board is the successor to and is vested with all rights, duties, obligations, and liabilities to which its predecessor governing boards and the Coordinating Council of Higher Education were subject, except as otherwise provided by law.



Enacted by Chapter 167, 1987 General Session

